Utah statutes.
26-3-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Disclosure" or "disclose" means the communication of health data to any individual or organization outside the department.

(2)  "Health data" means any information, except vital records as defined in Section 26-2-2, relating to the health status of individuals, the availability of health resources and services, and the use and cost of these resources and services.

(3)  "Identifiable health data" means any item, collection, or grouping of health data which makes the individual supplying it or described in it identifiable.

(4)  "Individual" means a natural person.

(5)  "Organization" means any corporation, association, partnership, agency, department, unit, or other legally constituted institution or entity, or part of any of these.

(6)  "Research and statistical purposes" means the performance of activities relating to health data, including:

(a)  describing the group characteristics of individuals or organizations;

(b)  analyzing the interrelationships among the various characteristics of individuals or organizations;

(c)  the conduct of statistical procedures or studies to improve the quality of health data;

(d)  the design of sample surveys and the selection of samples of individuals or organizations;

(e)  the preparation and publication of reports describing these matters; and

(f)  other related functions.

